Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-604
Approved certified nurse midwifery education program, defined.

Approved certified nurse midwifery education program means a certified nurse midwifery education program approved by the board. The board may require such program to be accredited by the American College of Nurse-Midwives.

Laws 1984, LB 761, § 12;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 85;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1749;

Laws 2007, LB185, § 21;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 216.